Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.050

Payment of expenses—Vouchers.

All expenses incurred by the committee, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided by the director of financial management and signed by the chair of the committee. Vouchers may be drawn upon funds appropriated generally by the legislature for legislative expenses or upon any special appropriation which may be provided by the legislature for the expenses of the committee.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6015; 1979 c 151 s 156; 1969 ex.s. c 260 s 9.]